Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-907
Mentally ill, defined.

Mentally ill means having a psychiatric disorder that involves a severe or substantial impairment of a person's thought processes, sensory input, mood balance, memory, or ability to reason which substantially interferes with such person's ability to meet the ordinary demands of living or interferes with the safety or well-being of others.

Laws 1977, LB 204, § 27;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 83-1009.01;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 27.

Substance dependence can be considered for purposes of determining that an individual is a dangerous sex offender. In re Interest of G.H., 279 Neb. 708, 781 N.W.2d 438 (2010).